New York, session 2025-2026, S3078.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 899-aa of the general business 2 law, as amended by chapter 117 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 7. Regardless of the method by which notice is provided, such notice 5 shall include contact information for the person or business making the 6 notification, the telephone numbers and websites of the relevant state 7 and federal agencies that provide information regarding security breach 8 response and identity theft prevention and protection information, and a 9 description of the categories of information that were, or are reason- 10 ably believed to have been, accessed or acquired by a person without 11 valid authorization, including specification of which of the elements of 12 personal information and private information were, or are reasonably 13 believed to have been, so accessed or acquired. If the person or busi- 14 ness providing the notification was the source of the breach, an offer 15 to provide appropriate identity theft prevention and mitigation 16 services, shall be provided at no cost to the affected person for not 17 less than twelve months, along with all information necessary to take 18 advantage of the offer to any person whose information was or may have 19 been breached if the breach exposed or may have exposed personal infor- 20 mation as defined in subdivision one of this section. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05151-01-5